Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2267
Swine herd cleanup plan, defined.

Swine herd cleanup plan shall mean a written agreement (1) which is designed to eradicate pseudorabies from the swine herd pursuant to section 54-2277, (2) which is developed by the swine herd owner or the authorized representative of the swine herd owner and the development of which may include the veterinarian for such swine herd, and (3) which is approved by the department.

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 32.